Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1982 and 1986 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1982, 1986, 1995, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor word changes under
AS

01.05.031

.

Administrative Code. —

For department of corrections, see 22 AAC.

Collateral references. —

Construction and application of state statute providing compensation for wrongful conviction and incarceration. 34 ALR4th 648.